Washington statutes.
RCW 43.114.070

LGBTQ pride month.

The legislature declares that:

(1) June of each year will be known as LGBTQ pride month;

(2) The fourth week in June is designated as a time for people of this state to celebrate the contributions to the state by LGBTQ people in the arts, sciences, commerce, and education; and

(3) Educational institutions, public entities, and private organizations are encouraged to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of LGBTQ people.

[ 2019 c 395 s 8.]